Tennessee, session 114, SB1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1403, is amended by deleting
subsection (e) and substituting:
(e)
(1) A parent of a participating student:
(A) Shall ensure that the participating student is annually
administered all Tennessee comprehensive assessment program (TCAP)
tests, or successor tests authorized by the state board of education, that
are administered to a public school student in the same grade or same
course subject as the participating student;
(B) In grade eleven (11) shall ensure that the student is
administered the examination that is administered to public school
students in grade eleven (11) pursuant to § 49-6-6001(b)(1); and
(C) In any of the grades kindergarten through three (K-3) shall
ensure that the participating student is annually administered each of the
three (3) Tennessee universal reading screeners, or universal reading
screeners approved by the state board of education, as described in § 49-
1-905(c), during each of the three (3) administration windows established
by the department of education pursuant to § 49-1-905(c)(1).
SB1249
002044
- 1 -

(2) A participating student's results on the tests administered pursuant to
this subsection (e) must be reported to the parent of the student.
(3) Students with disabilities who would have participated in the alternate
assessment, as determined on the student's IEP, are exempt from the
requirements in this subsection (e).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1404, is amended by adding
the following as new subsections:
(d)
(1) A participating school shall publish the school's lesson plans and
syllabus for each class offered by the school, a current list of materials in the
school's library collection, and the academic standards for each class offered by
the school on the school's website.
(2) As used in this subsection (d):
(A) "Library collection" means the materials made available to
students by the participating school, including materials made available to
students as part of a course curriculum; and
(B) "Materials" means books, periodicals, newspapers,
manuscripts, films, prints, documents, microfilm, discs, cassettes,
videotapes, video games, applications, and subscription content in any
form.
(e) A participating school shall ensure that all educators of the participating
school hold a valid license to teach in a public school that is issued by the state board of
education.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2607(e), is amended by adding
the following as new subdivisions:
- 2 - 002044

(6)
(A) Publish the school's lesson plans and syllabus for each class offered
by the school, a current list of materials in the school's library collection, and the
academic standards for each class offered by the school on the school's website;
and
(B) As used in this subdivision (e)(6):
(A) "Library collection" means the materials made available to
students by the participating school, including materials made available to
students as part of a course curriculum; and
(B) "Materials" means books, periodicals, newspapers,
manuscripts, films, prints, documents, microfilm, discs, cassettes,
videotapes, video games, applications, and subscription content in any
form; and
(7) Ensure that all educators of the participating school hold a valid license to
teach in a public school that is issued by the state board of education.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2606(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) As a condition of participating in the program:
(A) Participating students must be annually administered the Tennessee
comprehensive assessment program (TCAP) tests, or successor tests authorized
by the state board of education, that are administered to a public school student
in the same grade or same course subject as the participating student;
(B) Participating students in grade eleven (11) must be administered the
examination that is administered to public schools students in grade eleven (11)
pursuant to § 49-6-6001(b)(1); and
- 3 - 002044

(C) Participating students in kindergarten through grade three (K-3) must
annually be administered each of the three (3) Tennessee universal reading
screeners, or universal reading screeners approved by the state board of
education, as described in § 49-1-905(c), during each of the three (3)
administration windows established by the department of education pursuant to §
49-1-905(c)(1).
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 002044